Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3892.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.39, is amended to read: 121A.39 SCHOOL COUNSELORS. (a) A school district is strongly encouraged to have deleted text begin an adequate student-to-counselor ratio for its students beginning in the 2015-2016 school year and laterdeleted text end new text begin a minimum of one school counselor in every kindergarten through grade 12 school building. School leaders are encouraged to collaborate with school counselors to prioritize needs, identify strategies that will have the largest impact, and engage other educators in the delivery of the comprehensive school counseling curriculumnew text end . (b) A school counselor shall deleted text begin assist a student in meeting the requirements for high school graduation, college and career exploration, and selection, college affordability planning, and successful transitions into postsecondary education or training.deleted text end new text begin provide preventive and developmentally appropriate school counseling programs to kindergarten through grade 12 students to help enhance academic development, social and emotional development, and postsecondary and career development for all students. A school counselor must spend at least 80 percent of their working time engaged in direct, multitiered services to students, including but not limited to the following services:new text end new text begin (1) helping individual students with academic, career, or postsecondary planning and goal setting; new text end new text begin (2) delivering school counseling classroom instruction in the areas of academic development, social and emotional development, and postsecondary and career development; new text end new text begin (3) providing instruction that proactively enhances awareness of mental health and promotes positive, healthy behaviors to help students become productive members of society; new text end new text begin (4) engaging in short-term individual and small group counseling to students; new text end new text begin (5) helping students with crisis intervention focused on mental health or situational concerns such as grief, loss, or other difficult transitions; new text end new text begin (6) making referrals to appropriate school and community resources for long-term support for students with mental health issues, including suicidal ideation, violence, abuse, anxiety, and depression, with the intent of removing barriers to learning; new text end new text begin (7) consulting and collaborating with families, teachers, other student support personnel, administrators, school staff, and community members to support and advocate for the achievement and success of all students; new text end new text begin (8) collecting and analyzing school and student data to identify areas of success, needs, or challenges, and creating goals to close gaps in achievement, opportunity, or accessibility of information; or new text end new text begin (9) acting as a systems change agent to create an environment that promotes and supports all students' success in areas including enrollment patterns, equity, and access. new text end new text begin (c) A school counselor must, as a minimum requirement to be employed as a school counselor, hold an appropriate license granted by the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board. new text end